Massachusetts, session 194th, H845.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 55 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking section 7A, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 7A. (a)(1) An individual may make campaign contributions to candidates or
candidates’ committees; provided, however, that the aggregate of all such contributions for the
benefit of any one candidate and that candidate’s committee shall not exceed the sum of $1,000
per election.
(2) An individual may in addition make campaign contributions for the benefit of elected
political committees or non-elected political committees organized on behalf of a political party;
of 3

provided, however, that the aggregate of such campaign contributions for the benefit of the
political committees of any one political party shall not exceed the sum of $10,000 per election.
(3) An individual may in addition make campaign contributions to any political
committee not specified in paragraph (1), (2) or (4); provided, however, that the aggregate of
such campaign contributions to any one such political committee shall not exceed the sum of
$1,000 per election.
(4) An individual may in addition make contributions without limitation to ballot
question committees.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the aggregate of all contributions
by a legislative or executive agent for the benefit of any one candidate and such candidate’s
committee shall not exceed the sum of $200 per election. Notwithstanding any other provision of
this chapter, the aggregate of all contributions by a legislative or executive agent to any other
political committee, other than a ballot question committee, shall not exceed the sum of $200 per
election.
(c) The contribution and aggregate amount limits referred to in this section shall be
indexed biennially for inflation by the director, who, not later than December thirty-first of each
even numbered year beginning with 2026, shall calculate and publish such indexed amount,
using the federal consumer price index for the Boston statistical area. Such limits, after being
calculated as above, shall be rounded to the nearest $50; provided, that, if such resulting amount
is less than $50, the director shall retain a record of the resulting amount, when added to the
resulting amount calculated in each even numbered year since the last adjustment was made
equals or exceeds $50.
of 3

(d) For purposes of the limitations on contributions, a contribution to a designated
contribution committee which is forwarded to the designated recipient shall be treated in all
respects as a direct contribution from the original contributor to the designated recipient.
of 3